Hawaii statutes.
§490:11-108 Presumption that rule of law
continues unchanged. Unless a change in law has clearly been made, the
provisions of the new U.C.C. shall be deemed declaratory of the meaning of the
old U.C.C. [L 1978, c 155, pt of §1(34)]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next